Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.04
Licensed abatement worker, defined.

Licensed abatement worker means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to perform abatement projects.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1264.